Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.070

Official transcript withholding—Transmittal of information.

If a student who previously attended an approved private school enrolls in a public school but has not paid tuition, fees, or fines at the approved private school, the approved private school may withhold the student's official transcript, but shall transmit information to the public school about the student's academic performance, special placement, immunization records, and records of disciplinary action.

[ 1997 c 266 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1997 c 266: See notes following RCW 28A.600.455.